Utah statutes.
78A-6-513.   Effect of decree.

(1)  An order for the termination of the parent-child legal relationship divests the child and the parents of all legal rights, powers, immunities, duties, and obligations with respect to each other, except the right of the child to inherit from the parent.

(2)  An order or decree entered pursuant to this part may not disentitle a child to any benefit due him from any third person, including, but not limited to, any Indian tribe, agency, state, or the United States.

(3)  After the termination of a parent-child legal relationship, the former parent is neither entitled to any notice of proceedings for the adoption of the child nor has any right to object to the adoption or to participate in any other placement proceedings.

